District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-301.17

Quorum.

Repealed.

History

Aug. 6, 1962, 76 Stat. 272, Pub. L. 87-569, § 17
Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-250, § 2(b), 48 DCR 665
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(l), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-301.17.
1981 Ed., § 29-517.
1973 Ed., § 29-1017.